Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3976
Pure Milk Cash
Fund; created; use; investment.

All fees paid to
the department in accordance with the Nebraska Milk Act shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Pure Milk Cash Fund, which fund is
hereby created. All money credited to the fund shall be appropriated to the
uses of the department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the
act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3911;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB67, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.